Utah statutes.
63A-3-305.   Hearing requested -- Notice to debtor.

If a written response is received by the state and a hearing is requested, the state shall:

(1)  set a hearing date within 30 days of the receipt of the response; and

(2)  mail written notice of the hearing to the debtor at least 15 days before the date of the hearing.

